Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-923
Remedies; exclusive.

From and after January 1, 1970, the authority of any political subdivision to sue or be sued in its own name shall not be construed to authorize suits against such political subdivision on tort claims except as authorized in the Political Subdivisions Tort Claims Act and sections 16-727, 16-728, 23-175, 39-809, and 79-610. The remedies provided by such act and sections in such cases shall be exclusive.

Laws 1969, c. 138, § 17, p. 634;

Laws 1978, LB 819, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 23-2417;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1031.